lexd/noun.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun[sg] [<n>:] NounNumber[sg]
Noun[pl_all] [<n>:] [:-]? NounNumber[pl_all]
Noun[pl_in-laws] [<n>:] [:-]? NounNumber[pl_in-laws]
Noun[pl_cousins] [<n>:] [:-]? NounNumber[pl_cousins]
Noun[pl_sisters] [<n>:] [:-]? NounNumber[pl_sisters]
Noun[pl_times-of-day] [<n>:] NounNumber[pl_times-of-day]
Noun[pl_times-of-year] [<n>:] [:-]? NounNumber[pl_times-of-year]

# [Parker 2023] A Grammar of the Shugni language. Table 5.3
LEXICON NounNumber
<sg>:[sg]
<pl>:{Й}ен[pl_all]
<pl>:орҷ[pl_in-laws]
<pl>:у̊н[pl_cousins]
<pl>:дзинен[pl_sisters]
<pl>:аҷев[pl_times-of-day]
<pl>:а-ҷев[pl_times-of-day]
<pl>:ҷев[pl_times-of-year]
